Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
Regulation of Electricians

227.450.
Definitions for KRS 227.450 to 227.500.

As used in KRS

227.450

to

227.500

unless the context otherwise requires:

“Alteration” means any change, modification, or adjustment to an existing electrical system or conduit;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction;

“Department” means the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction;

“Division” means the Electrical Division within the department;

“Electrical contractor” means any licensed individual, partnership, or corporation that is licensed to engage in, offers to engage in, or advertises or holds itself out to be qualified to engage in designing, planning, superintending, contracting of, or assuming responsibility for the installation, alteration, or repair of any electrical system used for the purpose of furnishing heat, light, or power, and employs electrical workers to engage in this practice. If the electrical contractor is not a master electrician, the electrical contractor shall employ at least one (1) full-time master electrician;

“Electrical system” means any electrical work subject to standards provided within the National Electrical Code as adopted in the Uniform State Building Code, as promulgated by the department;

“Electrician” means any person licensed by the department who is employed by an electrical contractor and is engaged in the construction, alteration, or repair of any electrical system used for the purpose of furnishing heat, light, or power;

“Electrical” pertains to the installation, alteration, or repair of wires and conduits for the purpose of transmitting electricity, and the installation of fixtures and equipment in connection therewith;

“Electrical inspector” means any person certified by the commissioner pursuant to KRS

227.489

who, for compensation, inspects the construction and installation of electrical conductors, fittings, devices, and fixtures for light, heat, or power service equipment to ascertain the compliance with the National Electrical Code incorporated in the Uniform State Building Code promulgated pursuant to KRS

198B.050

or the standards of safety of the Commonwealth of Kentucky; and

“Repair” means the reconstruction or renewal of any part of an existing building for the purpose of its maintenance.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 208, § 1; 1964, ch. 137, § 1; 1976, ch. 346, § 1; 1978, ch. 117, § 42, effective July 1, 1978; 1990, ch. 14, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 2003, ch. 119, § 15, effective June 24, 2003; 2010, ch. 24, § 403, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 105, § 4, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 169, § 66, effective June 29, 2017.

227.460.
Application of KRS 227.450 to 227.500.

KRS

227.450

to

227.500

shall not apply to installations under the exclusive control of electric utilities for the purpose of communication, metering, or for the generation, control, transformation, transmission, and distribution of electric energy located in buildings used exclusively by utilities for such purposes or located outdoors on property owned or leased by the utility or on public highways, streets or roads, or outdoors by established rights on private property.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, for electrical work not related to buildings for human occupancy performed between the service disconnect and a facility owned or operated by an electric utility by or on behalf of the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet by 19 electrical contractors within the public right-of-way, the electrical contractor shall have the option of having the electrical inspection conducted by an electrical inspector:

Appointed by a local government under KRS

227.480

; or

Approved by the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 208, §§ 2, 3; 1974, ch. 386, § 49; 1976, ch. 346, § 2; 2022 ch. 69, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

Opinions of Attorney General.

“Electrical inspectors” employed by cities of the second and third classes are subject to regulation and the only certificate or license which the public service commission, previously the state board of examiners of electrical inspectors, would have power to grant would be for electrical inspectors already employees of the particular city and/or county for which they applied, which license would have statewide application.

OAG 73-607

.

227.470.
Cooperative agreements between local governments.

Any action authorized by the provisions of KRS

227.450

to

227.500

to be accomplished by a city or county may be undertaken cooperatively by two (2) or more local governments upon a resolution by the governing body of each local government to do so. Such cooperative agreements shall conform to the provisions of KRS Chapter 65.

If the governing body of two (2) or more counties authorizes a cooperative agreement, the individual cities within those counties do not have to execute the cooperative agreement and are deemed to be a party to the cooperative agreement for all purposes unless, within sixty (60) days after the adoption of the legislation authorizing the cooperative agreement by the county fiscal court in which that city is located, a resolution is passed by a city expressing its intent not to enter into a cooperative agreement.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 208, § 4; 1978, ch. 117, § 43, effective July 1, 1978; 1994, ch. 320, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

227.480.
Authority to require permits — Proof of licensure under KRS Chapter 227A — Exemptions — Inspectors — Inspection standards.

A city, county, urban-county government, charter county, or consolidated local government or the state shall, according to the Uniform State Building Code as it pertains to the plan review and inspection responsibilities of local governments or the state, require any person to obtain a permit before commencing construction, alteration, or repairs of any electrical system.

The city, county, urban-county government, charter county, or consolidated local government or the state shall require all inspections that are deemed necessary by the department for the safety of life and property. The department shall promulgate administrative regulations to describe the circumstances where inspections are required.

A city, county, urban-county government, charter county, or consolidated local government or the state shall not issue a permit unless the applicant submits proof of being licensed as an electrical contractor under KRS Chapter 227A or of acting on behalf of a licensed electrical contractor. However, the provisions of this subsection shall not apply to:

A homeowner or farmer who does construction, alteration, or repairs of any electrical system on his or her own premises or any other person exempt from licensing under KRS

227A.030

or

227A.150

;

Electrical work performed by the Commonwealth of Kentucky, a city, county, urban-county government, charter county, or consolidated local government, or any subdivision thereof;

A company with a recently deceased licensed electrical contractor, which shall be granted an interim period of up to one hundred eighty (180) continuous calendar days by the city, county, urban-county government, charter county, consolidated local government, or state to allow the company to utilize the license of the deceased electrical contractor if:

The company effectuates and documents all necessary bonding and insurance policies required by KRS Chapter 227A; and

Ensures that the bonding and insurance policies remain in effect for the entirety of the interim period of time extended; or

A disaster response business as defined in KRS

141.010

.

A city, county, urban-county government, charter county, or consolidated local government shall appoint and may fix the compensation of city, county, urban-county government, charter county, or consolidated local government electrical inspectors, and may by ordinance fix reasonable fees and establish other requirements for the conduct of electrical inspections within its boundaries. All electrical inspectors shall be certified under KRS

227.489

.

Reasonable standards for the construction, alteration, and repair of any electrical system shall be those adopted in the Uniform State Building Code, as promulgated by the department, and shall have as a minimum standard the requirements of the National Electrical Code, which may include Kentucky amendments. These standards shall be used by the electrical inspector in making his inspections.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 208, § 5; 1978, ch. 117, § 44, effective July 1, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 92, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 218, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 14, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 2003, ch. 119, § 16, effective June 24, 2003; 2004, ch. 81, § 1, effective April 6, 2004; 2006, ch. 83, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 404, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 105, § 5, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 169, § 67, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 22, § 6, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 31, § 8, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/12/2006). 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 83, sec. 6, provides that the Act, which included an amendment to this statute, shall be known and may be cited as “Isaac’s Act.”

Opinions of Attorney General.

If a county has an inspection program the county may designate a particular firm or person to act as its electrical inspector as long as the inspections are performed by inspectors certified by the Public Service Commission.

OAG 77-330

.

The Uniform State Building Code became mandatorily effective in the counties of Boyd, Campbell, Daviess, Fayette, Franklin, Jefferson, Kenton, McCracken and Warren on February 15, 1980; other Kentucky counties, including Whitley County, were covered effective August 15, 1981, and the remaining counties will be mandatorily covered effective August 15, 1982.

OAG 82-30

.

It is the duty and responsibility of the municipal government to employ its own certified inspectors or to enter into an interlocal agreement with another governmental entity, utilizing the inspectors of that entity, to conduct the required inspections and the statutes do not contemplate free-lance certified electrical inspectors contracting directly with the owners or occupiers of houses and other buildings to conduct electrical inspections; now that the Kentucky Building Code is mandatorily effective in the state, the enforcement of the code within a city, including the national electrical code which is part of the Kentucky Building Code, is the responsibility of the city.

OAG 83-32

.

Local enforcement of the national electrical code is contemplated.

OAG 83-32

.

A house or other building subject to the requirements of the national electrical code and located within the municipal limits is not eligible to receive a hookup to an electric source and electric service from electric utility until it has been inspected by a certified electrical inspector authorized to perform electrical inspections for the city; thus, a city was not required to connect power to a structure approved by a certified inspector other than the city inspector nor could the head of the city light and water department, without approval of the city’s legislative body, approve a hookup to a structure within the city limits which was inspected by someone other than the city inspector.

OAG 83-32

.

227.485.
Electrical inspectors to be certified by state board of examiners — Qualifications — Duties of board. [Repealed.]

227.487.
Fees for electrical inspections.

Except where other rules are adopted by a city or county, the following reporting and fee requirements shall apply to electrical inspections of residential buildings and single-family dwellings:

The inspector shall complete a report for each inspection. One (1) copy of the report shall be given to the owner of the electrical installation or his or her representative at the time the inspection fees are paid. A second copy of the report shall be sent to the department no later than one (1) week after the inspection is completed. The report shall include but is not limited to the following:

The address of the dwelling inspected;

The number of rooms, number of receptacles and number of switch boxes inspected;

Number of code violations, if any;

A description of each code violation, and recommended change to correct the violation;

The date and time of day the inspection commenced;

The time, in hours and minutes, required for the inspection;

The number of miles and hours and minutes of travel time incurred by the inspector for that inspection, if mileage and travel charges are added to the inspection fee; and

The amount charged for the inspection, separated into an amount for mileage, if any, and the amount for travel time, if any, and the amount charged for the actual inspection.

The maximum inspection fee shall be an amount equal to the wage paid to a majority of master electricians in the region in which the inspection is made, multiplied by the time required to conduct the inspection. This rate shall not be applied to travel time to and from the inspection.

An inspector may charge, in addition to the inspection fee, an amount for necessary travel to and from the inspection site. The mileage rate charged shall not exceed the amount per mile allowed to state employees, and the inspector shall charge no more than ten dollars ($10) per hour for travel time. If two (2) or more inspections are made during one (1) trip, then the cost of travel shall be divided between the inspections made. In no case shall an inspector charge more than once for the same trip, or charge for mileage or time not actually expended.

Each inspector shall furnish bond of five thousand dollars ($5,000) with surety satisfactory to the department.

The department shall design reporting forms which meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, and provide these forms to electrical inspectors. The department shall promulgate administrative regulations to administer the requirements of this section.

Nothing in this section is intended to limit the right of cities or counties to set fees or adopt rules for electrical inspections which are different from those specified in subsection (1), (2), (3) or (4) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 218, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 24, § 405, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 3, § 3, effective January 9, 2017; 2017 ch. 169, § 68, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2017). This statute was amended by
2017 Ky. Acts chs. 3 and
169, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

227.489.
Electrical inspectors required to be certified.

The commissioner shall require electrical inspectors to be certified. Examinations shall be based on the National Electrical Code incorporated in the Uniform State Building Code and the standards of safety prescribed by the department. Electrical inspectors who have been engaged in the inspection of electrical light and power wiring installations, based on the requirements of the National Electrical Code, for a period of three (3) years, may be certified on the basis of knowledge of this subject and experience. No certificate shall be denied, suspended, or revoked unless the applicant or certificate holder is afforded the opportunity for a hearing in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 27; 1976, ch. 346, § 5; 1978, ch. 117, § 45, effective July 1, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 93, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 318, § 146, effective July 15, 1996; 2010, ch. 24, § 406, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 69, effective June 29, 2017.

Opinions of Attorney General.

If a city has adopted an electrical code, the city has the authority to designate a specific firm to make electrical inspections, as long as the persons designated by the firm to represent it and the city are duly certified by the Public Service Commission.

OAG 76-296

.

227.490.
Local examination — Examining board — Local license — Disciplinary action. [Repealed.]

227.4901.
Examination for electrical contractors — Issuance of electrical contractor examination certificate — Reports on disciplinary actions against licensed contractors — Administrative regulations. [Repealed.]

227.491.
Certification of an electrical installation by an inspector — Invalidation by another inspector prohibited — Certification and inspection of electrical installation without seal prohibited — Other duties of inspector — Sanctions for inspector’s failure to comply.

An electrical inspector who certifies an electrical installation shall furnish and attach an approval sticker, bearing his or her signature and certification number in a conspicuous place on the main service entrance equipment. He or she shall also provide the owner of the electrical installation or his or her authorized agent with a certificate of approval if the same is requested. A complete record of each inspection shall be kept by the inspector, and these records shall be made available to the department upon its request.

An electrical inspector shall:

Not attempt to supplant, overrule, or otherwise invalidate the judgment of another electrical inspector whose services for a particular building, structure, or other project have been solicited by an owner, contractor, municipality, or other person without first obtaining express written consent from the designated inspector’s office supervising the original inspector;

Not certify unlicensed or unlawful electrical installations;

Not certify or inspect an electrical installation in a manufactured home or mobile home where the certified installer seal is not present pursuant to KRS

227.570

;

Not certify or inspect an electrical installation in a previously owned manufactured home or a previously owned mobile home when a Class B1 seal is not present as required by KRS

227.605

; and

Verify required electrical licensure on projects within the inspector’s jurisdiction. The electrical inspector shall report all electrical licensure violations to the department within ten (10) days of discovery.

Failure of an electrical inspector to comply with any provision of this chapter or the administrative regulations promulgated thereunder shall subject that inspector to review by the commissioner with possible suspension of certification for a period not to exceed one (1) year from the date of the commissioner’s ruling.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 346, § 3; 1978, ch. 117, § 47, effective July 1, 1978; 1980, ch. 188, § 222, effective July 15, 1980; 2006, ch. 83, § 3, effective March 28, 2006; 2008, ch. 118, § 2, effective January 1, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 407, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 105, § 6, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 169, § 70, effective June 29, 2017.

227.492.
Investigation of misconduct of electrical inspector.

It shall be the duty of the commissioner to investigate alleged misconduct of any electrical inspector certified under KRS

227.489

when, in the opinion of the commissioner, there is sufficient evidence to suggest that misconduct exists. Any party may seek redress from the commissioner when alleged misconduct of an electrical inspector is deemed to have worked an undue hardship on the party.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 346, § 4; 1978, ch. 117, § 48, effective July 1, 1978; 2010, ch. 24, § 408, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 71, effective June 29, 2017.

227.495.
Additional powers of electrical inspectors — Sanctions for misconduct.

Electrical inspectors shall have the authority to take immediate action to prevent further electrical work at any inspection site where, in the judgment of the electrical inspector, imminent danger to life or property exists. Actions the electrical inspector may take to address this danger are the following:

Stop-work order regarding any electrical work at the inspection site; or

Recommendations of fines or other penalties as described in KRS

227.500

.

The findings of the electrical inspector under subsection (1) of this section shall be presumed to be correct until the city, county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government, the department, or the party affected by the findings demonstrates that it is more likely than not that the electrical inspector was incorrect in his or her findings.

The actions of an electrical inspector under this section are subject to misconduct investigation by the commissioner under KRS

227.492

, and the inspector is subject to any appropriate criminal or civil penalty due to misconduct or violation of any provision of KRS

227.200

to

227.400

or

227.450

to

227.500

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 83, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 409, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/12/2006). 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 83, sec. 6, provides that the Act, which created this section, shall be known and may be cited as “Isaac’s Act.”

227.500.
Authority to fix penalty.

A city, county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government may fix as a penalty for the violation of any ordinance or resolution passed under the provisions of KRS

227.200

to

227.500

, a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), or imprisonment for not more than ninety (90) days, or both.

If properly recommended by an electrical inspector under KRS

227.495

, a city, county, urban-county, charter county, or consolidated local government may fix as a penalty for the violation of any ordinance or resolution passed under the provisions of this chapter, the Uniform State Building Code, or the standards of safety of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the first offense, and a fine of two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each subsequent offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 208, § 7; 1966, ch. 146, § 7; 1978, ch. 384, § 94, effective June 17, 1978; 1990, ch. 14, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; 2006, ch. 83, § 4, effective July 12, 2006.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/12/2006). 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 83, sec. 6, provides that the Act, which included an amendment to this statute, shall be known and may be cited as “Isaac’s Act.”

227.530.
Electrical Advisory Committee created — Members — Meetings — Purpose — Compensation.
[Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 361, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 14, § 6, effective July 13, 1990; 2003, ch. 119, § 17, effective June 24, 2003; 2006, ch. 256, § 5, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 410, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 100, § 16, effective June 8, 2011; 2014, ch. 125, § 2, effective July 15, 2014; 2015 ch. 105, § 7, effective June 24, 2015; repealed by 2017 ch. 169, § 114, effective June 29, 2017.